Colorado, session 2026A, HB1411.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-2-104, amend (1);
and add (3.5) as follows:
25.5-2-104. State-funded health and medical care - rules.
(1) (a) Beginning no later than January 1, 2025, There is created the
state medical assistance program, referred to in this section as "state
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

medical assistance". SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS DETAILED IN SUBSECTION
(1)(b) OF THIS SECTION, state medical assistance includes all benefits and
services at the same cost to the beneficiary as are BENEFITS AND SERVICES
offered pursuant to the medical assistance program, defined in section
25.5-4-103 (13), such that, to the maximum extent possible, AN eligible
individuals must not be INDIVIDUAL IS NOT able to tell that the person is
THEY ARE enrolled in a different program from medical assistance, pursuant
to AS DEFINED IN section 25.5-4-103 (13).
(b) PREGNANT WOMEN WHO ARE NOT ELIGIBLE FOR THE MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM SOLELY DUE TO THEIR IMMIGRATION STATUS AND
CHILDREN UNDER NINETEEN YEARS OLD WHOSE FAMILY HOUSEHOLD INCOME
DOES NOT EXCEED TWO HUNDRED SIXTY PERCENT OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY
LINE, ADJUSTED FOR FAMILY SIZE, AND WHO DO NOT MEET THE IMMIGRATION
REQUIREMENTS FOR ELIGIBILITY ARE SUBJECT TO THE FOLLOWING
LIMITATIONS ON BENEFITS:
(I) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, THEY ARE SUBJECT TO AN ANNUAL CAP
ON DENTAL SERVICES IN THE AMOUNT OF ONE THOUSAND ONE HUNDRED
DOLLARS;
(II) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, THEY MUST BE OFFERED
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES ON A FEE-FOR-SERVICE BASIS ONLY;
(III) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, THEY ARE NOT ELIGIBLE FOR
SERVICES OFFERED THROUGH THE ACCOUNTABLE CARE COLLABORATIVE
PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-5-419; AND
(IV) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, THEY SHALL NOT RECEIVE
MANAGED CARE SERVICES PURSUANT TO PART 4 OF ARTICLE 5 OF THIS TITLE
25.5.
(c) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, CHILDREN UNDER NINETEEN YEARS
OLD WHOSE FAMILY HOUSEHOLD INCOME DOES NOT EXCEED TWO HUNDRED
SIXTY PERCENT OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LINE, ADJUSTED FOR FAMILY SIZE,
AND WHO ARE NOT ELIGIBLE FOR THE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM DUE
TO THEIR IMMIGRATION STATUS, SHALL NOT RECEIVE, PURSUANT TO THE
STATE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM CREATED IN THIS SECTION,
LONG-TERM SERVICES AND SUPPORTS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 25.5-5-102
(1)(e); SECTION 25.5-5-202 (1)(c), (1)(n), AND (1)(p); HOME HEALTH
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1411

SERVICES DESCRIBED IN SECTION 25.5-5-102 (1)(f) FOR MEMBERS WHO
REQUIRE ONGOING HOME HEALTH SERVICES FOLLOWING SIXTY DAYS OF
ACUTE HOME HEALTH SERVICES; AND SERVICES DESCRIBED IN PART 19 OF
ARTICLE 6 OF THIS TITLE 25.5 UNLESS THEY ALREADY RECEIVE THESE
SERVICES ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026.
(3.5) (a) FOR THE 2026-27 STATE FISCAL YEAR, ENROLLMENT IN
STATE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE OF CHILDREN UNDER NINETEEN YEARS OLD
WHOSE FAMILY HOUSEHOLD INCOME DOES NOT EXCEED TWO HUNDRED SIXTY
PERCENT OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LINE, ADJUSTED FOR FAMILY SIZE, AND
WHO ARE NOT ELIGIBLE FOR THE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM DUE TO
THEIR IMMIGRATION STATUS, IS SUBJECT TO AN ENROLLMENT CAP OF
TWENTY-FIVE THOUSAND IF ONE OF THE FOLLOWING CONDITIONS IS MET:
(I) ENROLLMENT OF THE CHILDREN DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION
(3.5)(a) IN STATE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE EXCEEDS TWENTY-FIVE THOUSAND
CHILDREN; OR
(II) EXPENDITURES FOR A FISCAL QUARTER OF THE 2026-27 STATE
FISCAL YEAR EXCEED ONE QUARTER OF THE APPROPRIATION FOR STATE
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PLUS FIVE PERCENT TO ACCOUNT FOR COST
FLUCTUATIONS DUE TO SEASONALITY.
(b) IF A CONDITION DETAILED IN SUBSECTION (3.5)(a) OF THIS
SECTION IS MET, THE STATE DEPARTMENT MUST CAP THE ENROLLMENT OF
THE CHILDREN DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3.5)(a) OF THIS SECTION AT
TWENTY-FIVE THOUSAND CHILDREN BEGINNING ON THE FIRST DAY OF THE
MONTH FOLLOWING SIXTY DAYS AFTER THE STATE DEPARTMENT
DETERMINES THAT A CONDITION DETAILED IN SUBSECTION (3.5)(a) OF THIS
SECTION IS MET.
(c) THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT RULES NECESSARY TO
IMPLEMENT THE ENROLLMENT CAP DETAILED IN THIS SUBSECTION (3.5).
(d) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1, 2026, THE STATE DEPARTMENT
SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE DETAILING
WHAT IS DRIVING ENROLLMENT AND UTILIZATION OF STATE MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE BY CHILDREN WHO ARE UNDER NINETEEN YEARS OLD WHOSE
FAMILY HOUSEHOLD INCOME DOES NOT EXCEED TWO HUNDRED SIXTY
PERCENT OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LINE, ADJUSTED FOR FAMILY SIZE, AND
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1411

WHO ARE NOT ELIGIBLE FOR THE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM DUE TO
THEIR IMMIGRATION STATUS. THE REPORT MUST INCLUDE STRATEGIES FOR
REDUCING COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH ENROLLING THESE CHILDREN IN STATE
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-5-201, amend
(6)(a) and (6)(b) as follows:
25.5-5-201. Optional provisions - optional groups - rules.
(6) (a) Beginning no later than January 1, 2025, A pregnant person
who is not a citizen and who is not eligible for medical assistance pursuant
to subsection (4) of this section is eligible to receive medical assistance
pursuant to this subsection (6)(a), SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS DETAILED
IN SECTION 25.5-2-104 (1)(b), if the individual meets the eligibility
requirements other than those related to citizenship and immigration status.
(b) A pregnant person who is eligible for medical assistance
pursuant to this subsection (6) remains continuously eligible for all medical
services pursuant to the medical assistance program, SUBJECT TO THE
LIMITATIONS DETAILED IN SECTION 25.5-2-104 (1)(b), for the twelve-month
postpartum period, so long as eligibility remains in effect pursuant to
subsection (4.5)(a) of this section.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-8-107, repeal
(1)(i) as follows:
25.5-8-107. Duties of the department - schedule of services -
premiums - copayments - subsidies - purchase of childhood
immunizations.
(1) In addition to any other duties pursuant to this article 8, the
department has the following duties:
(i) (I) The department shall develop and implement an outreach
strategy for Coloradans who become eligible for health coverage pursuant
to section 25.5-2-104, 25.5-2-105, 25.5-5-201 (6), or 25.5-8-109 (7). The
state department shall work with stakeholders to develop an outreach
strategy that includes:
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1411

(A) Funding for community-based organizations to partner with the
department on outreach;
(B) A method for providing information related to eligibility and
enrollment that can be provided to nonprofit partners, school districts, and
charter schools for outreach purposes; and
(C) At a minimum, providing information related to eligibility and
coverage in English, Spanish, and in each language spoken by at least
two-and-one-half percent of the population of any county who speak
English less than very well, as defined by the United States bureau of the
census American community survey, and who speak the minority language
at home;
(II) Approximately twelve and twenty-four months after
implementation of the strategy required pursuant to subsection (1)(i)(I) of
this section, the department shall convene stakeholders, including directly
impacted individuals, service providers, and advocacy organizations that are
diverse with regard to race, ethnicity, immigration status, sexual orientation,
and gender identity and who are affected by higher rates of health
disparities and inequities. The department shall report on the outreach and
enrollment strategy outcomes, including enrollment of eligible persons into
these programs compared to those persons who are eligible for coverage,
but not enrolled.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 25.5-2-105.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-109, repeal
(1)(a.8) as follows:
24-75-109. Controller may allow expenditures in excess of
appropriations - limitations - appropriations for subsequent fiscal year
restricted - repeal.
(1) For the purpose of closing the state's books, and subject to the
provisions of this section, the controller may, on or after May 1 of any fiscal
year and before the forty-fifth day after the close thereof, upon approval of
the governor, allow any department, institution, or agency of the state,
including any institution of higher education, to make an expenditure in
excess of the amount authorized by an item of appropriation for such fiscal
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1411

year if:
(a.8) The overexpenditure is by the department of health care policy
and financing for the state children's basic health plan, established pursuant
to section 25.5-2-105; or
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-4-201, amend (1)
as follows:
25.5-4-201. Cash system of accounting - financial administration
of medical services premiums - medical programs administered by
department of human services - federal contributions - rules.
(1) The state department shall utilize the cash system of accounting,
as enunciated by the governmental accounting standards board, regardless
of the source of revenues involved, for all activities of the state department
relating to the financial administration of any nonadministrative expenditure
that qualifies for federal financial participation under Title XIX of the
federal "Social Security Act", and for the administration of the state-funded
health and medical care program, created pursuant to section 25.5-2-104,
and for the state children's basic health plan, created pursuant to section
25.5-2-105, except for expenditures under the program for the medically
indigent, article 3 of this title 25.5.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-5-335, amend
(2)(a), (2)(b), and (7)(b) as follows:
25.5-5-335. Continuous medical coverage for children and adults
feasibility study - federal authorization - rules - report - definition.
(2) At a minimum, the feasibility study must consider the costs;
implementation factors, including county workload, training, and
administrative burdens on the counties, information technology systems,
upgrades, and associated costs; potential health benefits for individuals and
communities, including disadvantaged and marginalized groups; impacts of
increased use of preventive and high-value health services; administrative
savings, including, but not limited to, reducing or eliminating eligibility
processing for populations during the continuous eligibility period;
reductions in administrative turnover and coverage loss; and, to the extent
practicable, social and economic impacts with respect to the following:
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1411

(a) Allowing an eligible child, as defined in this article 5 and articles
2, 3, 6, and 8 of this title 25.5, including children eligible under sections
25.5-2-104 and 25.5-2-105 SECTION 25.5-2-104, to remain continuously
eligible for medical assistance and the children's basic health plan for
twenty-four months after the last day of the month in which the child was
enrolled;
(b) Allowing an eligible child, as defined in this article 5 and articles
2, 3, 6, and 8 of this title 25.5, including children eligible under sections
25.5-2-104 and 25.5-2-105 SECTION 25.5-2-104 who are less than six years
of age OLD, to remain continuously eligible for medical assistance or the
children's basic health plan without regard to a change in household income
until the child reaches six years of age OLD;
(7) (b) For purposes of seeking federal authorization pursuant to
subsection (7)(a) of this section, an eligible child is as defined in this article
5 and articles 2, 3, 6, and 8 of this title 25.5, including a child eligible
pursuant to sections 25.5-2-104 and 25.5-2-105 SECTION 25.5-2-104, and
must be under three years of age OLD. An eligible child shall remain
REMAINS continuously eligible without regard to household income until the
eligible child reaches three years of age OLD; except that a child is no longer
eligible and must be disenrolled from a medical assistance program if the
state department becomes aware that the child has moved out of the state,
the state department or county possesses facts indicating that the family has
requested the child's voluntary disenrollment, the state department
determines eligibility was erroneously granted, or the child is deceased.
SECTION 8. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, $3,378,166 is appropriated to the
department of health care policy and financing. This appropriation is from
the general fund. To implement this act, the department may use this
appropriation as follows:
(a) $2,286,549 for Medicaid management information system
maintenance and projects;
(b) $1,017,700 for Colorado benefits management systems,
operating and contract expenses; and
(c) $73,917 for behavioral health fee-for-service payments, which
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1411

amount is subject to the "(M)" notation as defined in the annual general
appropriation act for the same fiscal year.
(2) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, the general assembly
anticipates that the department of health care policy and financing will
receive $137,274 in federal funds for behavioral health fee-for-service
payments to implement this act. The appropriation in subsection (1)(c) of
this section is based on the assumption that the department will receive this
amount of federal funds.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, to
implement this act, general fund appropriations made in the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of
health care policy and financing are decreased as follows:
(a) $262,500 for general professional services and special projects;
(b) $271,951 for medical and long-term care services for
Medicaid-eligible individuals, which amount is subject to the "(M)"
notation as defined in the annual general appropriation act for the same
fiscal year;
(c) $753,747 for behavioral health capitation payments, which
amount is subject to the "(M)" notation as defined in the annual general
appropriation act for the same fiscal year; and
(d) $12,914,525 for health benefits for children lacking access due
to immigration status.
(4) The decrease of the appropriations in subsection (3) of this
section is based on the assumption that the anticipated amount of federal
funds received for the 2026-27 state fiscal year by the department of health
care policy and financing will decrease as follows:
(a) $487,500 for general professional services and special projects,
which is subject to the "(I)" notation as defined in the annual general
appropriation act for the same fiscal year;
(b) $505,052 for medical and long-term care services for
Medicaid-eligible individuals; and
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1411

(c) $1,399,814 for behavioral health capitation payments.
(5) Subsection (3) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if either:
(a) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of health care policy and financing is less than the amount of the
adjustments required in subsection (3) of this section for:
(I) General professional services and special projects;
(II) Medical and long-term care services for Medicaid-eligible
individuals;
(III) Behavioral health capitation payments; or
(IV) Health benefits for children lacking access due to immigration
status; or
(b) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of health care
policy and financing for:
(I) General professional services and special projects;
(II) Medical and long-term care services for Medicaid-eligible
individuals;
(III) Behavioral health capitation payments; or
(IV) Health benefits for children lacking access due to immigration
status.
SECTION 9. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, to implement this
act, the cash funds appropriation from the adult dental fund created in
section 25.5-5-207 (4)(a), C.R.S., made in the annual general appropriation
act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of health care policy
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1411

and financing for medical and long-term care services for Medicaid-eligible
individuals is decreased by $280,827.
(2) The decrease of the appropriations in subsection (1) of this
section is based on the assumption that the anticipated amount of federal
funds received for the 2026-27 state fiscal year by the department of health
care policy and financing for medical and long-term care services for
Medicaid-eligible individuals will decrease by $521,535.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if either:
(a) The amount of the cash funds appropriation from the adult dental
fund created in section 25.5-5-207 (4)(a), C.R.S., made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of health care policy and financing for medical and long-term care services
for Medicaid-eligible individuals is less than the amount of the adjustment
required in subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of health care
policy and financing for medical and long-term care services for
Medicaid-eligible individuals.
SECTION 10. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, to implement this
act, the general fund appropriation made in the annual general appropriation
act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of health care policy
and financing for medical and long-term care services for Medicaid-eligible
individuals is decreased by $280,827, which amount is subject to the "(M)"
notation as defined in the annual general appropriation act for the same
fiscal year.
(2) The decrease of the appropriations in subsection (1) of this
section is based on the assumption that the anticipated amount of federal
funds received for the 2026-27 state fiscal year by the department of health
care policy and financing for medical and long-term care services for
Medicaid-eligible individuals will decrease by $521,535.
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1411

(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if either:
(a) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of health care policy and financing for medical and long-term care services
for Medicaid-eligible individuals is less than the amount of the adjustment
required in subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of health care
policy and financing for medical and long-term care services for
Medicaid-eligible individuals.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1411

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
SECTION 11. Appropriation to the department of health care policy and financing for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado 2025, section
2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part VI (1)(A) and the affected totals as Part VI is amended by section 5 of chapter 150, (SB 25-228), and section 17 of chapter 151, (SB 25-270),
and as Part VI (1)(A) and the affected totals are further amended by section 1 of HB 26-1155 as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
PART VI
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING
(1) EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S OFFICE
(A) General Administration
Personal Services 76,144,403
(795.8 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 13,063,358
Short-term Disability 51,631
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 378,612
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 7,939,888
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1411

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Salary Survey 2,299,634
Step Pay 151,359
PERA Direct Distribution 1,638,429
Workers' Compensation 230,107
Operating Expenses 3,400,301
Legal Services 2,824,915
Administrative Law Judge
Services 2,636,344
Payment to Risk
Management and Property
Funds 280,008
Leased Space 3,712,918
Payments to OIT 15,566,219
CORE Operations 35,879
General Professional
Services and Special
Projects 47,899,410
47,524,410
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1411

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
178,253,415 69,183,269 14,104,503a 3,852,606b 91,113,037(I)
177,878,415 69,052,019 90,869,287(I)
a Of this amount, $12,618,763 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S.,$399,810 shall be from the
Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Nursing Facility Provider Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5.5)(a), C.R.S., $361,397 shall be from the Children's Basic Health
Plan Trust created in Section 25.5-8-105 (1), C.R.S., $278,999 shall be from the Adult Dental Fund created in Section 25.5-5-207 (4)(a), C.R.S., $204,488 shall be from the Primary
Care Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., $131,531 shall be from the Nursing Home Penalty Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-6-205 (3)(a), C.R.S., $59,140 shall be
from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Intermediate Care Facility Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5.7)(a), C.R.S., and $50,375 shall be from the Breast
and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Fund created in Section 25.5-5-308 (8)(a)(I), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $1,374,082 shall be transferred from the Department of Human Services from the Health Care and Economic Security Staff Development Center line item appropriation,
$881,600 shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries, $839,181 shall be transferred from the Colorado Benefits Management System, Health Care and Economic Security Staff
Development Center line item appropriation in this department, $577,832 shall be transferred from the Department of Higher Education from the Fee-for-service Contracts with State
Institutions for Speciality Education Programs line item, $95,773 shall be from the Department of Personnel and Administration, $57,678 shall be from the Department of Early Childhood,
and $26,460 shall be from the Department of Public Health and Environment from the Women, Infants, and Children Supplemental Food Grant line item.
TOTALS PART VI
(HEALTH CARE
POLICY AND
FINANCING)25 $18,980,783,085 $4,381,549,873 $1,293,261,386a $2,168,909,052b $160,576,367 $10,976,486,407c
$18,980,408,085 $4,381,418,623 $10,976,242,657c
a Of this amount, $1,292,968,309 shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S., and $293,077 shall be General Fund Exempt pursuant to
Section 24-22-117 (1)(c)(I)(B.5), C.R.S. Said $293,077 is not subject to the statutory limitation on General Fund appropriations imposed by Section 24-75-201.1, C.R.S.
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1411

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
b Of this amount, $22,134,496 contains an (I) notation.
c Of this amount, $422,806,064 $422,562,314 contains an (I) notation.
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1411

SECTION 12. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 8 of this act takes effect only if the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which
case section 8 takes effect upon the effective date of this act or of the annual
general appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is later;
section 9 of this act takes effect only if House Bill 26-1401 does not
become law, in which case section 9 takes effect upon the effective date of
this act; and section 10 of this act takes effect only if House Bill 26-1401
becomes law, in which case section 10 takes effect upon the effective date
of this act or of House Bill 26-1401, whichever is later.
SECTION 13. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1411

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1411